Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.225

Transportation benefit districts.

The legislative authority of a city may establish a transportation benefit district subject to the provisions of chapter 36.73 RCW.

[ 2005 c 336 s 22; 1989 c 53 s 2; 1987 c 327 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.

Severability—1989 c 53: See note following RCW 36.73.020.

Transportation benefit districts: Chapter 36.73 RCW.